Louisiana, session 2026, HB885.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:707.2 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 32:705.2 and
726.2 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§705.2. Secure digital motor vehicle titles; electronic recordation; electronic
signatures
A. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, may implement a system that offers vehicle title holders a fully paperless,
secure digital vehicle title instead of the standard secure paper vehicle title.
B. Once implemented, the secure digital title system shall:
(1) Include all functions related to title re-assignments.
(2) Meet or exceed applicable security requirements as set forth in
regulations promulgated by the office of motor vehicles.
(3) Provide title holders with online, real-time access to motor vehicle titles
and status of titles in process.
Page 1 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-925 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 885
C. A secure digital vehicle title produced under this Section shall be regarded
as an official title from the state of Louisiana and be fully recognized legally for any
motor vehicle related transactions within the state and all other United States
jurisdictions.
D. A duly certified copy of the office of motor vehicle's secure digital title
shall be admissible in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding in this state
as evidence of the existence of the title.
E. The commissioner of the office of motor vehicles may promulgate any
necessary rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Section.
* * *
§707.2. Electronic media system for lien recordation and title information; fees;
required bond; confidentiality of information; rules and regulations
A. The department shall develop and implement on a statewide basis no later
than January 1, 2010, a computer system which will permit the electronic recording
of information concerning the perfection and release of vehicle security interests
without submitting or receiving paper title documents, including electronic lien,
electronic titling, and electronic registration. The department may allow the
submission of vehicle title information for new, transferred, and corrected
certificates of title, including the perfection and release of security interests, through
electronic media in a cost-effective manner in lieu of the submission and
maintenance of paper documents otherwise required by this Chapter. The system
shall enable the ability to transact, process, record, and transmit certificates of title
through a completely electronic process for:
(1) All business entities and their service providers applying for automotive
titles and registrations, for itself or the customers.
(2) Electronic submission of liens and lien satisfactions by financial
institutions and its service providers pursuant to R.S. 32:708.
Page 2 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-925 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 885
B. The electronic lien, electronic titling, and electronic registration system
shall provide that any lien or security pursuant to R.S. 32:708 shall be electronically
transmitted to the department based on the following:
(1) If there are one or more liens or encumbrances on the motor vehicle, the
department shall electronically transmit the lien to the first lienholder and notify the
first lienholder of any additional liens, provided that a motor vehicle lien is noted on
its face of the certificate of the title and notwithstanding any other requirements in
this Chapter.
(a) Subsequent lien satisfactions shall include the name and address of the
person satisfying the lien.
(b) A certificate of title shall not be issued until the last lien is satisfied and
a clear certificate of title is issued to the owner of the vehicle. The department is not
obligated to print a paper title until the final lien is satisfied.
(2)(a) Vehicles subject to an electronic lien shall have the certificate of title
for the vehicle considered to be physically held by the lienholder for the purpose of
compliance with state and federal odometer disclosure requirements.
(b) A duly certified copy of the office of motor vehicle's electronic record
of the lien shall be admissible in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding in
this state as evidence of an existence of a lien.
B. C.(1) The department is hereby authorized to contract with public license
tag agents for the purpose of administering a system which will provide for the
recording of vehicle title information and security interest notification without
issuance of a paper title.
(2) The department is hereby authorized to promulgate rules and regulations
in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, to provide for certain limited
exceptions to the electronic recordation requirements set forth by this Section, for
individuals and lienholders that are not normally engaged in the business or practice
of financing vehicles.
Page 3 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-925 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 885
C. D.(1) An approved public license tag agent operating a secured host
computer system interfacing with the computer system of the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, and the computer system of a
lending institution or other sales finance company shall be bonded in an amount
specified by the department. The public license tag agent is hereby authorized to
charge a fee to customers utilizing this electronic media system.
(2) Each federally insured depository institution that originates more than
two hundred fifty motor vehicle transactions per year, and each finance company,
lending institution, or other lender shall designate a public tag agent with which such
bank, finance company, lending institution, or other lender shall interface its
computer system for the purpose of receiving electronic confirmation from the
department, of the receipt and the filing of the security interest on the subject motor
vehicle. Each federally insured depository institution that originates more than two
hundred fifty motor vehicle transactions per year, and each finance company, lending
institution, or other lender shall also designate such public tag agent when
transmitting a release or satisfaction of its lien.
(3) Any request to convert an electronic lien and title record to a paper
document shall be forwarded to the department by the federally insured depository
institution, finance company, lending institution, or other lender through its interface
with its designated public tag agent. Upon receipt of the appropriate title and
handling fees, the department shall provide the requested paper title.
(4) Any request to convert an existing paper title to an electronic title shall
be forwarded to the department by the federally insured depository institution,
finance company, lending institution, or other lender through its interface with its
designated public tag agent. Upon receipt of such a request, the department shall
convert the paper to an electronic title at a charge to the lender not to exceed one
dollar and fifty cents per title. This charge shall be forwarded to the state treasurer
for deposit into the Office of Motor Vehicles Customer Service and Technology
Dedicated Fund Account. The public tag agent fee shall not exceed three dollars per
Page 4 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-925 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 885
title conversion request. The provisions of R.S. 32:412.1 and 728 shall not apply to
this Paragraph.
D. E. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a written or printed
report of an electronic media transaction or recording required under the provisions
of this Section, if certified as true and correct by the department, shall serve as
evidence of any signature, acknowledgment, or information which was provided to
or by the department through electronic means, and the certification shall be
admissible in any legal proceeding as evidence of the facts stated therein.
E. F. All information received by the department or a public license tag agent
in connection with an electronic lien recordation or title information shall remain
confidential as specified by the department.
F. G. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act as are necessary to implement the provisions
of this Section, including but not limited to rules and regulations regarding the
setting of fees in accordance with R.S. 47:532.1(C), the amount of bond required for
public license tag agents operating a secured host computer system, and the
confidentiality of information.
G. H.(1) The department is authorized to form a task force to develop and
implement the system required by this Section. The members of this task force shall
be appointed by the secretary and shall include representatives from the department,
the commercial banking industry, sales finance companies, credit unions, savings
institutions, and the vehicle dealership industry.
(2)(a) The task force shall research methods whereby the department,
lending institutions and sales finance companies may exchange and maintain
information concerning the perfection and release of vehicle security interests
without submitting or receiving a paper title document. Further, the task force shall
develop methods whereby lending institutions and sales finance companies may
submit, through a variety of electronic media, updated information pertaining to the
Page 5 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-925 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 885
title record, including the addition, assignment or release of vehicle security
interests.
(b) No later than January 1, 2009, the task force shall develop and implement
a pilot program to implement the requirements set forth by this Section.
H. I. The procedures referred to in this Section shall be referred to as
electronic lien and title services or E.L.T. services.
J. Out-of-state lienholders participating in the Electronic Lien and Title
program recognized by the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators
shall be deemed in compliance with this Section.
K. Lienholders shall process electronic lien releases within two business
days from the date the funds are deemed collected and shall maintain real-time
accuracy of status information.
L. Applications for registration submitted by licensed Louisiana motor
vehicle dealers may be executed and submitted using electronic signatures and
electronic records pursuant to R.S. 47:503.
M. All systems approved under this Section shall utilize electronic signatures
and shall integrate seamlessly with electronic lien and title systems.
* * *
§726.2. Tampering with or altering odometers; electronic usages
A. Licensed Louisiana motor vehicle dealers may execute and submit
electronic signatures and electronic records for all motor vehicle titling, registration,
odometer disclosure, and related documents in connection with the sale, lease,
transfer, or financing of a motor vehicle.
B.(1) Any sales agreement for the transfer of a motor vehicle between
persons as defined in this Section shall contain the following statement:
"Both buyer and seller have examined the title certificate of the motor vehicle
and it correctly reflects the mileage as it appears on the odometer."
(2) This statement shall be placed conspicuously and prominently on the
agreement.
Page 6 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-925 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 885
C. It shall be unlawful for any person to transfer ownership of a motor
vehicle previously registered in this state or a motor vehicle used by a dealer as a
demonstrator, unless the transferor takes one of the following actions:
(1)(a) Enters on an electronic form prescribed by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, as specified by state law, the
mileage the motor vehicle has been operated.
(b) The form shall be signed by both the seller and buyer and contain a
statement that both parties have viewed the odometer of the motor vehicle. The form
as completed shall then be attached to the instrument evidencing transfer of
ownership.
(2) Enters upon the form "not the actual mileage" in the event that the
odometer mileage is known to the person to be less than the motor vehicle has
actually traveled.
(3) Enters the total cumulative mileage on the form in the event that it is
known that the mileage indicated on the odometer is beyond its designated mechnical
limits.
(4) Enters the same information as set forth in Paragraphs (1) through (3) of
this Subsection on the owner's title certification.
(5) The owner of a motor vehicle supplies its mileage upon the annual
renewal registration form supplied by the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections, office of motor vehicles.
D.(1) All electronic odometer disclosures executed pursuant to this Section
shall comply with 49 U.S.C. 32705 and 49 CFR Part 580 et seq.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, may approve electronic systems that meet or exceed the Identity Assurance
Level 2 standard outlined pursuant to the National Institute of Standards and
Technology under SP 800-63 or any successor federal standard.
Page 7 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-925 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 885
E. It shall be a violation of this Section for any person to knowingly give a
false statement to a transferee, unless the vehicle has been resold in reliance on the
required statement of the prior owner made pursuant to this Section.
F. No motor vehicle previously registered in another state, shall be registered
for use in this state, unless the application for a certificate of title in Louisiana is
accompanied by the prior owner's certificate of title and includes the statement as set
forth in Subsection (B)(1) of this Section.
G. The certificate of title of the motor vehicle issued to the new owner by the
state of Louisiana shall:
(1) Be provided electronically, or printed using a process determined by the
commissioner of the office of motor vehicles to be the most efficient and effective
means of avoiding unauthorized duplication.
(2) Indicate on its face the mileage required to be disclosed by the transferor
under this Section.
(3) Contain a space for the transferee to disclose the mileage at the time of
any future transfer and to sign and date the disclosure.
H. No registration card shall be issued in this state for any motor vehicle,
unless:
(1) The application for the registration card contains the prior owner's most
recent registration card and the prior owner's title.
(2) The new registration card contains such information as provided on the
application.
I. Pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 9:2607, any form used to transfer a
motor vehicle may be signed electronically and shall not require notarization.
(1) All systems approved under this Section for electronic signatures and
electronic records shall integrate seamlessly with the electronic lien and title system
established under this Section to create a unified electronic transaction platform.
(2) Electronic signatures, electronic records, and powers of attorney executed
pursuant to this Section shall have the same force and effect as written signatures and
Page 8 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-925 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 885
paper documents, consistent with the Louisiana Uniform Electronic Transactions
Act, pursuant to R.S. 9:2601 et seq., the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and
National Commerce Act, pursuant to 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., and the Remote Online
Notarization Act, pursuant to R.S. 25:621 et seq.
J. A licensed Louisiana motor vehicle dealer who relies in good faith on a
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, approved
system for electronic signatures, remote notarization of power of attorney, electronic
records, or electronic odometer disclosures shall be deemed in compliance with the
state's requirements governing the form, execution, and submission of these
documents.
K.(1) A licensed Louisiana motor vehicle dealer using an approved system
in good faith and without actual knowledge of fraud or unauthorized access shall be
immune from civil liability arising solely from the use of electronic signatures,
remote notarization of powers of attorney or electronic records, including claims
alleging improper execution, authentication, or transmission, provided said dealer
complied with the requirements of this Section and any rules promulgated in
accordance with law.
(2) The immunity provided for in Paragraph (1) of this Section shall not
apply to intentional misconduct or gross negligence.
L. The provisions contained in this Section shall apply to all motor vehicles
bought, sold, or transferred within the state of Louisiana.